Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2262.02
Intensive supervision probation programs; legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature finds and declares that intensive supervision probation programs are an effective and desirable alternative to imprisonment. It is the Legislature's intent to encourage the establishment of programs for the intensive supervision of selected probationers. It is further the intent of the Legislature that such programs be formulated to protect the safety and welfare of the public in the community where the programs are operating and throughout the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1990, LB 220, § 1.